Massachusetts, session 194th, S1889.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5 of chapter 32 of the Generals Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended in subsection 2, in subdivision (a) by striking out the first
table after line 139 and inserting in places thereof the following:-
Age Last Birthday at Date of Retirement
Per Cent Group 1 Group 2 Group 4
___________________________________________________________________
4.65 80 --- ---
4.50 79 --- ---
4.45 78 --- ---
4.30 77 --- ---
of 3

4.15 76 --- ---
4.00 75 --- ---
3.85 74 --- ---
3.70 73 ---- ---
3.55 72 --- ---
3.40 71 --- ----
3.25 70 --- ---
3.10 69 --- ---
2.95 68 --- ---
2.80 67 --- ---
2.65 66 --- ---
2.50 65 60 and over 55 and over
2.40 64 59 54
2.30 63 58 53
2.20 62 57 52
2.10 61 56 51
2.00 60 55 50
of 3

1.90 59 --- 49
1.80 58 --- 48
1.70 57 --- 47
1.60 56 --- 46
1.50 55 --- 45
________________________________________________________________
Section 2. At the time that this legislation goes into effect, the MTRS shall recalculate
the annual pension benefit of all its retired members of the MTRS who retired, over age 65, prior
to the enactment of this law. Such retirees shall have their annual pension benefit upgraded, if
indicated, to the pension calculated under the provisions of this legislation.
of 3